ug.aff
FLAG num
SFX 20055 N 1
SFX 20055 0 لدىڭىزمۇ .

SFX 20056 N 1
SFX 20056 0 الىزملىق .

SFX 20057 N 1
SFX 20057 0 ىب .

SFX 20058 N 1
SFX 20058 0 لمايمىز .

SFX 20059 N 1
SFX 20059 0 ۇزىدىن .

SFX 20060 N 1
SFX 20060 0 ىرىگىمۇ .

SFX 20061 N 1
SFX 20061 0 لەردىنمۇ .

SFX 20062 N 1
SFX 20062 0 -دەرەخ .

SFX 20063 N 1
SFX 20063 0 اغدىن .

SFX 20064 N 1
SFX 20064 0 ەنگەنىدى .

SFX 20065 N 1
SFX 20065 0 تېرلىق .

SFX 20066 N 1
SFX 20066 0 ۈچىسەن .

SFX 20067 N 1
SFX 20067 0 لىتىلىش .

SFX 20068 N 1
SFX 20068 0 ىۋاتامسىز .

SFX 20069 N 1
SFX 20069 0 ۈلىدىكەن .

SFX 20070 N 1
SFX 20070 0 شتىڭ .

SFX 20071 N 1
SFX 20071 0 ايلىماق .

SFX 20072 N 1
SFX 20072 0 سلىكىڭلارنى .

SFX 20073 N 1
SFX 20073 0 ۇچىلىرىنىڭ .

SFX 20074 N 1
SFX 20074 0 نباغلىق .

SFX 20075 N 1
SFX 20075 0 ىققا .

SFX 20076 N 1
SFX 20076 0 ىغانسىز .

SFX 20077 N 1
SFX 20077 0 نراق .

SFX 20078 N 1
SFX 20078 0 يۋاتىمىز .

SFX 20079 N 1
SFX 20079 0 كىڭىزدە .

SFX 20080 N 1
SFX 20080 0 ۋالغاندا .

SFX 20081 N 1
SFX 20081 0 ەكلەردىكى .

SFX 20082 N 1
SFX 20082 0 قچىدىن .

SFX 20083 N 1
SFX 20083 0 اقچىنىڭ .

SFX 20084 N 1
SFX 20084 0 بو .

SFX 20085 N 1
SFX 20085 0 پاقلىق .

SFX 20086 N 1
SFX 20086 0 زىسىز .

SFX 20087 N 1
SFX 20087 0 مىغىچە .

SFX 20088 N 1
SFX 20088 0 ىتىمدىن .

SFX 20089 N 1
SFX 20089 0 گېر .

SFX 20090 N 1
SFX 20090 0 كۈچى .

SFX 20091 N 1
SFX 20091 0 ەل .

SFX 20092 N 1
SFX 20092 0 ىنىگە .

SFX 20093 N 1
SFX 20093 0 شلاپ .

SFX 20094 N 1
SFX 20094 0 مىغانلارغا .

SFX 20095 N 1
SFX 20095 0 نالمىغان .

SFX 20096 N 1
SFX 20096 0 شارمىز .

SFX 20097 N 1
SFX 20097 0 ىسەڭ .

SFX 20098 N 1
SFX 20098 0 ماسلىقتىكى .

SFX 20099 N 1
SFX 20099 0 چىلىكتۇر .

SFX 20100 N 1
SFX 20100 0 تالدىن .

SFX 20101 N 1
SFX 20101 0 اغقىچە .

SFX 20102 N 1
SFX 20102 0 تىلىدۇ .

SFX 20103 N 1
SFX 20103 0 ۋەتسىلا .

SFX 20104 N 1
SFX 20104 0 ۇيۇق .

SFX 20105 N 1
SFX 20105 0 ىتىمىزنىڭ .

SFX 20106 N 1
SFX 20106 0 ۇلداپ .

SFX 20107 N 1
SFX 20107 0 ىسىكەن .

SFX 20108 N 1
SFX 20108 0 قانلىقىڭىزنى .

SFX 20109 N 1
SFX 20109 0 الپۇك .

SFX 20110 N 1
SFX 20110 0 الچىسى .

SFX 20111 N 1
SFX 20111 0 ۇرتۇش .

SFX 20112 N 1
SFX 20112 0 -خاتا .

SFX 20113 N 1
SFX 20113 0 گار .

SFX 20114 N 1
SFX 20114 0 تىشى .

SFX 20115 N 1
SFX 20115 0 شتۇرسا .

SFX 20116 N 1
SFX 20116 0 تىدە .

SFX 20117 N 1
SFX 20117 0 -ئاداۋەت .

SFX 20118 N 1
SFX 20118 0 كاتنى .

SFX 20119 N 1
SFX 20119 0 ەنلىرىم .
